Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB523.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 200.470 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No child shall be accepted for care or treatment by the Office for Children with
Special Health Care Needs if his or her parents or legal guardian are able to pay for
such treatment, except where the child resides in an area of the state where adequate
care and treatment are not otherwise available, in which event referral must be
made by the doctor caring for the child and the parents or guardian shall reimburse
the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs for all cost expended by the
office for treatment.
(2) In the event the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs determines that
the parents or legal guardian of a child with a disability can pay only a portion of
the cost of treatment through their own resources or through resources available to
them, such parents or guardian shall pay such sums as they are able to pay and the
funds thus received shall be turned over to the Office for Children with Special
Health Care Needs and applied to the cost of treatment and care of the child.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/28/2026 2:22 PM Jacketed